Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Nonstock, Nonprofit Corporations

273.160.
Nonstock, nonprofit corporations authorized; who may incorporate; purposes; exclusions; religious, charitable or educational corporation; application of other statutes; no tax exemption. [Repealed.]

273.161.
Definitions for KRS 273.161 to 273.390.

As used in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Corporation” or “domestic corporation” means a nonprofit corporation subject to the provisions of KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, except a foreign corporation, and for the purposes of KRS

273.277

to

273.293

, the term “corporation” also means domestic nonprofit limited liability companies;

“Disaster” means any natural, technological, or civil emergency that causes damage of sufficient severity and magnitude to result in a declaration of a state of emergency by a county, the Governor, or the President of the United States;

“Foreign corporation” means a nonprofit corporation organized under laws other than the laws of this state;

“Nonprofit corporation” means a corporation no part of the income or profit of which is distributable to its members, directors or officers;

“Articles of incorporation” means the original or restated articles of incorporation or articles of consolidation and all amendments thereto, including articles of merger;

“Bylaws” means the code or codes of rules adopted for the regulation or management of the affairs of the corporation irrespective of the name or names by which such rules are designated;

“Member” means one having membership rights in a corporation in accordance with the provisions of its articles of incorporation or bylaws;

“Board of directors” means the group of persons vested with the management of the affairs of the corporation irrespective of the name by which group is designated;

“Insolvent” means inability of a corporation to pay its debts as they become due in the usual course of its affairs;

“Principal office” means the office, in or out of this state, so designated in the annual report where the principal executive offices of a domestic or foreign corporation are located;

“Secretary” means the corporate officer to whom the board of directors has delegated responsibility for custody of the minutes of the meetings of the board of directors and the members and for authenticating records of the corporation;

“Individual” includes the estate of an incompetent or deceased individual;

“Entity” includes a domestic or foreign corporation; not-for-profit corporation; profit and not-for-profit unincorporated association; business or statutory trust, estate, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, trust, and two (2) or more persons having a joint or common economic interest; and state, United States, and foreign government;

“Person” includes individual and entity.

“Name of record with the Secretary of State” means any real, fictitious, reserved, registered, or assumed name of an entity;

“Real name” shall have the meaning set forth in KRS

365.015

;

“Deliver” or “delivery” means any method of delivery used in conventional commercial practice, including delivery by hand, mail, commercial delivery, and electronic transmission;

“Effective date of notice” means notice when effective under KRS 273.162(3);

“Electronic transmission” or “electronically transmitted” means any process of communication not directly involving the physical transfer of paper that is suitable for the retention, retrieval, and reproduction of information by the recipient;

“Notice” means notice as described in KRS

273.162

;

“Sign” or “signature” includes any manual, facsimile, or conformed or electronic signature; and

“Limited liability company” or “LLC” means a domestic nonprofit limited liability company.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 2; 1986, ch. 202, § 7, effective March 28, 1986; 1988, ch. 23, § 195, effective January 1, 1989; 2007, ch. 137, § 79, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
79, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 113, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2015 ch. 34, § 68, effective June 24, 2015; 2019 ch. 131, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

273.162.
Notice.

Notice under this chapter shall be in writing unless oral notice is reasonable under the circumstances. Notice by electronic transmission is written notice.

Notice may be communicated in person, by mail or other method of delivery, or by telephone, voice mail, or other electronic means. If these forms of personal notice are impracticable, notice may be communicated by a newspaper of general circulation in the area where published, or by radio, television, or other form of public broadcast communication.

Written notice by a corporation to a member, if in a comprehensible form, shall be effective:

Upon deposit in the United States mail, if mailed postpaid and correctly addressed to the member’s address shown in the corporation’s current record of members; or

When electronically transmitted to the member in a manner authorized and in accordance with the member’s instructions, if any.

Written notice to a domestic or foreign corporation authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth may be addressed to its registered agent at its registered office or to the corporation or its secretary at its principal office address of record with the Secretary of State.

Except as provided in subsections (3) and (4) of this section, written notice, if in a comprehensible form, shall be effective at the earliest of the following:

When received;

Five (5) days after its deposit in the United States mail, if mailed postpaid and correctly addressed; or

On the date shown on the return receipt, if sent by registered or certified mail, return receipt requested, and the receipt is signed by or on behalf of the addressee.

Oral notice shall be effective when communicated, if communicated in a comprehensible manner.

If KRS

273.161

to

273.390

prescribe notice requirements for particular circumstances, those requirements shall govern. If articles of incorporation or bylaws prescribe notice requirements not inconsistent with this section or other provisions of KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, those requirements shall govern.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 66, effective June 24, 2015.

273.163.
Applicability.

The provisions of KRS

273.161

to

273.390

relating to domestic corporations shall apply to:

All corporations organized hereunder; and

All nonprofit corporations heretofore organized under any act repealed by 1968 Acts, ch. 165, for a purpose or purposes for which a corporation might be organized under KRS

273.161

to

273.390

.

The provisions of KRS

273.161

to

273.390

relating to foreign corporations shall apply to all foreign nonprofit corporations conducting affairs in this state for a purpose or purposes for which a corporation might be organized under KRS

273.161

to

273.390

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 3.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A nonprofit corporation governed by KRS Ch. 273 did not obtain any rights under KRS

271.068

(now repealed) of the general corporate statutes which were subsequently saved by KRS

271A.680

(now repealed).

OAG 74-556

.

273.167.
Purposes for which nonprofit corporations may be organized under KRS 273.161 to 273.390.

Except as otherwise prohibited by law, corporations may be organized under KRS

273.161

to

273.390

for any lawful purpose or purposes, including without being limited to any one (1) or more of the following purposes: charitable; benevolent; eleemosynary; educational; civic; patriotic; political; governmental; religious; social; recreational; fraternal; literary; cultural; athletic; scientific; agricultural; horticultural; animal husbandry; and professional, commercial, industrial, or trade association.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 4; 2018 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.

Opinions of Attorney General.

If a voluntary association of registered members of a political party now comprising an unincorporated political club incorporates pursuant to this section, it would be prohibited by KRS

123.010

(now repealed) and

123.020

(now repealed) from making contributions to political candidates or organizations, including expenditures of membership dues for such purposes.

OAG 73-559

.

“Public agency” does not include a chamber of commerce under the generally accepted definition of that kind of organization and, whether organized under KRS Chs. 102 or 273, it is not subject to the requirements of KRS

61.810

pertaining to open meetings.

OAG 74-566

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Property exempt from taxation, Const., § 170.

Northern Kentucky Law Review.

Tobergte, Regulating the Nonprofit Corporation, 16 N. Ky. L. Rev. 325 (1989).

273.170.
Articles of incorporation. [Repealed.]

273.171.
General powers.

Each corporation shall have power:

To have perpetual succession by its corporate name unless a limited period of duration is stated in its articles of incorporation.

To sue and be sued, complain and defend, in its corporate name.

To have a corporate seal and alter it at pleasure, provided, however, that the presence or absence of a corporate seal on or from a writing shall neither add to nor detract from the legality thereof nor affect its validity in any manner or respect.

To purchase, take, receive, lease, take by gift, devise or bequest, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use and otherwise deal in and with real or personal property, or any interest therein, wherever situated.

To sell, convey, mortgage, pledge, lease, exchange, transfer and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property and assets.

To lend money to its employees, other than its officers and directors, and otherwise assist its employees, officers and directors.

To purchase, take, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire, own, hold, vote, use, employ, sell, mortgage, lend, pledge, or otherwise dispose of, and otherwise use and deal in and with, shares or other interests in, or obligations of, other domestic or foreign corporations, whether for profit or not for profit, associations, partnerships or individuals, or direct or indirect obligations of the United States, or of any other government, state, territory, governmental district or municipality or of any instrumentality thereof.

To make contracts and incur liabilities, borrow money at such rates of interest as the corporation may determine, issue its notes, bonds, and other obligations, and secure any of its obligations by mortgage or pledge of all or any of its property, franchises and income.

To lend money for its corporate purposes, invest and reinvest its funds, and take and hold real and personal property as security for the payment of funds so loaned or invested.

To conduct its affairs, carry on its operations, and have offices and exercise the powers granted by KRS

273.161

to

273.390

in any state, territory, district, or possession of the United States, or in any foreign country.

To elect or appoint officers and agents of the corporation, who may be directors or members, and define their duties and fix their compensation.

To make and alter bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or with the laws of this state, for the administration and regulation of the affairs of the corporation.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, to make donations for the public welfare or for charitable, scientific or educational purposes; and in time of war to make donations in aid of war activities.

To indemnify any director or officer or former director or officer of the corporation, or any person who may have served at its request as a director or officer of another corporation in which it owns shares of capital stock or of which it is a creditor, against expenses actually and reasonably incurred by him in connection with the defense of any action, suit or proceeding, civil or criminal, in which he is made a party by reason of being or having been such director or officer, except in relation to matters as to which he shall be adjudged in such action, suit or proceeding to be liable for negligence or misconduct in the performance of duty to the corporation; and to make any other indemnification that shall be authorized by the articles of incorporation or bylaws, or resolution adopted after notice to the members entitled to vote.

To pay pensions and establish pension plans or pension trusts for any or all of its directors, officers and employees.

To cease its corporate activities and surrender its corporate franchise.

To have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect any or all of the purposes for which the corporation is organized.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 5; 1988, ch. 23, § 179, effective January 1, 1989.

273.172.
Powers of Secretary of State.

The Secretary of State shall have the power reasonably necessary to perform the duties required of him by this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 219, effective January 1, 1989.

273.173.
Defense of ultra vires.

No act of a corporation and no conveyance or transfer of real or personal property to or by a corporation shall be invalid by reason of the fact that the corporation was without capacity or power to do such act or to make or receive such conveyance or transfer, but such lack of capacity or power may be asserted:

In a proceeding by a member or a director against the corporation to enjoin the doing or continuation of unauthorized acts, or the transfer of real or personal property by or to the corporation. If the unauthorized acts or transfer sought to be enjoined are being, or are to be, performed pursuant to any contract to which the corporation is a party, the court may, if all of the parties to the contract are parties to the proceeding and if it deems the same to be equitable, set aside and enjoin the performance of such contract, and in so doing may allow to the corporation or the other parties to the contract, as the case may be, compensation for the loss or damage sustained by either of them which may result from the action of the court in setting aside and enjoining the performance of such contract, but anticipated profits to be derived from the performance of the contract shall not be awarded by the court as a loss or damage sustained.

In a proceeding by the corporation, whether acting directly or through a receiver, trustee, or other legal representative, or through members in a representative suit, against the officers or directors of the corporation for exceeding their authority.

In a proceeding by the Attorney General, as provided in KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, to dissolve the corporation, or in a proceeding by the Attorney General to enjoin the corporation from performing unauthorized acts, or in any other proceeding by the Attorney General.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 6.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Ham, Corporations, 64 Ky. L.J. 253 (1975-76).

273.177.
Corporate name.

The name of the corporation shall satisfy the requirements of KRS

14A.3-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, §
7; 1976, ch. 27, §
2; 1980, ch. 294, §
5, effective July 15, 1980; 1988, ch. 23, §
196, effective January 1, 1989; 2006, ch. 149, §
228, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 137, §
80, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
80, effective July 15, 2010; repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 60, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed, reenacted, and amended by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, and repealed and reenacted by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment not serve to void the amendment, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

Opinions of Attorney General.

The registration of a company’s trademark pursuant to KRS

365.560

(now repealed) to

365.625

(now repealed) would in no way prohibit a group of persons from incorporating under KRS Ch. 273 and using as its corporate name, a name registered as a trademark by another company.

OAG 71-157

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Rutledge, The 2007 Amendments to the Kentucky Business Entity Statutes,
97 Ky. L.J. 229 (2008).

273.178.
Reserved name. [Repealed.]

273.179.
Registered name. [Repealed.]

273.180.
Corporate name. [Repealed.]

273.181.
Registered office — Agent for service of process. [Repealed.]

273.182.
Registered office and registered agent.

Each corporation shall continuously maintain in this state a registered office and a registered agent that comply with KRS

14A.4-010

.

History.

Repealed, reenact. and amend., Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 61, effective January 1, 2011.

273.183.
Service of process on corporation. [Repealed.]

273.184.
Change of registered office or registered agent. [Repealed.]

273.1841.
Resignation of registered agent. [Repealed.]

273.1842.
Statement of change of principal office.

A corporation that changes the mailing address of its principal office shall comply with KRS

14A.5-010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 137, §
3, effective June 26, 2007; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 51, §
3, effective July 15, 2010; repealed and reenact., Acts 2010, ch. 151, § 62, effective January 1, 2011.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(1/1/2011). This section was repealed and reenacted without change to the existing language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 51, effective 7/15/10, and repealed and reenacted with the new language by 2010 Ky. Acts ch. 151, effective 1/1/2011. Pursuant to Section 184 of Acts ch. 51, it was the intent of the General Assembly that the repeal and reenactment by ch. 51 not serve to void amendments made by other bills, and these Acts do not appear to be in conflict, therefore, they have been codified together.

273.185.
Service on corporation. [Repealed.]

273.187.
Members.

A corporation may have one (1) or more classes of members or may have no members. If the corporation has one (1) or more classes of members, the designation of such class or classes, the manner of election or appointment and the qualifications and rights of the members of each class shall be set forth in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. If the corporation has no members, that fact shall be set forth in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. A corporation may issue certificates evidencing membership therein.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation, a director, officer, employee, or member of a corporation shall not be personally liable for the acts or debts of the corporation, except that the member may become personally liable by reason of his or her own acts or conduct.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 10; 2010, ch. 133, § 15, effective July 15, 2010.

273.190.
Filing and recording of articles; issuance of certificate of incorporation; fees. [Repealed.]

273.191.
Bylaws.

The initial bylaws of a corporation shall be adopted by its board of directors. The power to alter, amend or repeal the bylaws or adopt new bylaws shall be vested in the board of directors unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. The bylaws may contain any provisions for the regulation and management of the affairs of a corporation not inconsistent with law or the articles of incorporation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 11.

273.193.
Meetings of members.

Meetings of members may be held at such place, either within or without this state, as may be provided in the bylaws. In the absence of any such provision, all meetings shall be held at the registered office of the corporation in this state.

An annual meeting of the members shall be held at such time as may be provided in the bylaws. Failure to hold the annual meeting at the designated time shall not work a forfeiture or dissolution of the corporation.

Special meetings of the members may be called by the president or by the board of directors. Special meetings of the members may also be called by such other officers or persons or number or proportion of members as may be provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. In the absence of a provision fixing the number or proportion of members entitled to call a meeting, a special meeting of members may be called by members having one-twentieth (1/20) of the votes entitled to be cast at such meeting.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 12.

273.195.
Remote communication.

If the board of directors is authorized to determine the place of an annual or special meeting of members, the board of directors, in its sole discretion, may determine that the meeting shall not be held at any place but shall instead be held solely by means of remote communication under subsection (2) of this section.

If authorized by the board of directors in its sole discretion, and subject to such guidelines and procedures as the board of directors may adopt, members and proxy holders not physically present at a meeting of members may by means of remote communication:

Participate in a meeting of members; and

Be deemed present in person and vote at a meeting of members, whether such meeting is to be held at a designated place or solely by means of remote communication, if:

The corporation implements reasonable measures to verify that each person deemed present and permitted to vote at the meeting by means of remote communication is a member or proxy holder;

The corporation implements reasonable measures to provide members and proxy holders referred to in subparagraph 1. of this paragraph a reasonable opportunity to participate in the meeting and to vote on matters submitted to the members, including an opportunity to read or hear the proceedings of the meeting substantially concurrently with the proceedings; and

The corporation records any vote or other action taken at the meeting by a member or proxy holder by means of remote communication. The corporation shall maintain as a record the recorded vote or other action taken.

HISTORY:

2015 ch. 34, § 74, effective June 24, 2015.

273.197.
Notice of members’ meetings.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws, notice stating the place, day and hour of meeting and, in case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given not less than ten (10) nor more than thirty-five (35) days before the date of the meeting, by or at the direction of the president, or the secretary, or the officers or persons calling the meeting, to each member entitled to vote at such meeting.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 13; 2015 ch. 34, § 69, effective June 24, 2015.

273.200.
Beginning of corporate existence; who constitute corporation; validity and effect of various papers. [Repealed.]

273.201.
Voting.

The right of the members, or any class or classes of members, to vote may be limited, enlarged or denied to the extent specified in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. Unless so limited, enlarged or denied, each member, regardless of class, shall be entitled to one (1) vote on each matter submitted to a vote of members.

A member entitled to vote may vote in person or, unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws otherwise provide, may vote by proxy executed in writing by the member or by his duly authorized attorney-in-fact. No proxy shall be valid after eleven (11) months from the date of its execution, unless otherwise provided in the proxy. Where directors or officers are to be elected by members, the bylaws may provide that such elections may be conducted by mail.

The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may provide that in all elections for directors every member entitled to vote shall have the right to cumulate his vote and to give one (1) candidate a number of votes equal to his vote multiplied by the number of directors to be elected, or by distributing such votes on the same principle among any number of such candidates.

If a corporation has no members or its members have no right to vote, the directors shall have the sole voting power.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 14.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Where there is nothing in the bylaws to prevent a proxy vote, a member of the Northeast Area Regional Crime Council, Inc., may vote by proxy.

OAG 72-550

.

Subsection (2) of this section permits members of a corporation to vote by proxy, but that does not relate to the board of directors.

OAG 84-367

.

273.203.
Quorum.

The bylaws may provide the number or percentage of members entitled to vote represented in person or by proxy, or the number or percentage of votes represented in person or by proxy, which shall constitute a quorum at a meeting of members. In the absence of any such provision, members holding one-tenth (1/10) of the votes entitled to be cast on the matter to be voted upon represented in person or by proxy shall constitute a quorum. A majority of the votes entitled to be cast on a matter to be voted upon by the members present or represented by proxy at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be necessary for the adoption thereof unless a greater proportion is required by KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 15.

273.207.
Board of directors.

The affairs of a corporation shall be managed by a board of directors. Directors need not be residents of this state or members of the corporation unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws so require. The articles of incorporation or the bylaws may prescribe other qualifications for directors.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 16.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Council members of nonprofit corporation, who act as its board of directors cannot appoint a proxy.

OAG 74-645

.

273.210.
Corporate powers. [Repealed.]

273.211.
Number and election or appointment of directors — Classes — Terms — Removal.

The board of directors shall consist of three (3) or more individuals, with the number specified in or fixed in accordance with the articles of incorporation or bylaws, except as to the number of the first board of directors which shall be fixed by the articles of incorporation.

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may establish a minimum and maximum number of directors. If a variable range is established, the number of directors may be fixed or changed by the board of directors, within the minimum and maximum, in the manner provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

No decrease in number shall have the effect of shortening the term of any incumbent director.

The directors constituting the first board of directors shall be named in the articles of incorporation and shall hold office until the first annual election of directors or for such other period as may be specified in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. Thereafter, directors shall be elected or appointed in the manner and for the terms provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws. In the absence of a provision fixing the term of office, the term of office of a director shall be one (1) year, and until his successor is elected and has accepted his election.

Directors may be divided into classes and the terms of office of the several classes need not be uniform. Each director shall hold office for the term for which he is elected or appointed and until his successor shall have been elected or appointed and qualified.

A director may be removed from office pursuant to any removal procedure provided in the articles of incorporation or bylaws.

Every director of a corporation, by acceptance of election or appointment as a director, including by service, shall be deemed to have consented to the jurisdiction of the courts of the Commonwealth of Kentucky for any action by, in the name of, or on behalf of the corporation.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 17; 2012, ch. 81, § 100, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 193, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

273.213.
Vacancies.

Any vacancy occurring in the board of directors and any directorship to be filled by reason of an increase in the number of directors may be filled by the affirmative vote of a majority of the remaining directors, though less than a quorum of the board of directors, unless the articles of incorporation or the bylaws provide that a vacancy or directorship so created shall be filled in some other manner, in which case such provision shall control.

A director elected or appointed, as the case may be, to fill a vacancy shall be elected or appointed for the unexpired term of his predecessor in office.

History.

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 18.

273.215.
General standards for directors.

A director of a nonprofit corporation subject to the provisions of KRS

273.161

to

273.387

shall discharge his duties as a director, including his duties as a member of a committee:

In good faith;

On an informed basis; and

In a manner he honestly believes to be in the best interests of the corporation.

Such director shall be considered to discharge his duties on an informed basis if he makes, with the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances, inquiry into the business and affairs of the corporations, or into a particular action to be taken or decision to be made.

In discharging his duties such director shall be entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

One (1) or more officers or employees of the corporation whom the director honestly believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the director honestly believes are within the person’s professional or expert competence; or

A committee of the board of directors of which he is not a member if the director honestly believes the committee merits confidence.

A director of a nonprofit corporation shall not be considered to act in good faith if he has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (3) of this section unwarranted.

In addition to any other limitation on such director’s liability for monetary damages contained in any provision of the corporation’s articles of incorporation adopted in accordance with the provisions of KRS

273.248

, any action taken as a director, or any failure to take any action as a director, shall not be the basis for monetary damages or injunctive relief unless:

The director has breached or failed to perform the duties of the director’s office in compliance with this section; and

In the case of an action for monetary damages, the breach or failure to perform constitutes willful misconduct or wanton or reckless disregard for human rights, safety or property.

A person bringing an action for monetary damages under this section shall have the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence the provisions of subsection (5)(a) and (b) of this section, and the burden of proving that the breach or failure to perform was the legal cause of the damages suffered.

Nothing in this section shall eliminate or limit the liability of any director for any act or omission occurring prior to July 15, 1988.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 245, effective January 1, 1989; 1988, ch. 224, § 12, effective July 15, 1988.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was created by two 1988 Acts which do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled together.

273.217.
Quorum of directors — Prohibition on director voting by proxy.

A majority of the number of directors fixed by the bylaws, or in the absence of a bylaw fixing the number of directors, then of the number stated in the articles of incorporation, shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, unless otherwise provided in the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the board of directors may permit any or all directors to participate in a regular or special meeting by, or conduct the meeting through the use of, any means of communication by which all directors participating may simultaneously communicate with each other during this meeting. A director participating in a meeting by this means shall be deemed to be present in person at the meeting.

The act of the majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the board of directors, unless the act of a greater number is required by KRS

273.161

to

273.390

, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws.

Irrespective of whether or not the corporation has members, a director may not vote by proxy.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 19; 2015 ch. 34, § 70, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 193, § 6, effective July 14, 2018.

Opinions of Attorney General.

This section permits the bylaws of a nonprofit corporation to specify less than a majority of the directors as a quorum for conducting business.

OAG 79-250

.

273.219.
Conflict-of-interest transaction.

A conflict-of-interest transaction is a transaction with the corporation in which a director of the corporation has a direct or indirect interest. A conflict-of-interest transaction shall not be the subject of equitable relief on the ground of the director’s interest in the transaction if:

The material facts of the transaction and the director’s interest were disclosed or known to the board of directors, or a committee of the board duly constituted under KRS

273.221

, and the board of directors or the committee authorized, approved, or ratified the transaction; or

The transaction was fair to the corporation.

For purposes of this section, a director of the corporation has an indirect interest in a transaction if:

Another entity in which he or she has a material financial interest is a party to the transaction; or

Another entity of which he or she is a director, officer, general partner, manager, trustee, or person in a similar position is a party to the transaction, and the transaction is or should be considered by the board of directors of the corporation.

For purposes of subsections (1)(a) and (2)(b) of this section, director authorization, approval, or ratification is effective if done by a majority vote of the directors who do not have a direct or indirect interest in the transaction within the meaning of this section, even if the majority is less than a quorum, but a transaction may not be authorized, approved, or ratified by a single director. Director authorization may be delegated to a committee under KRS

273.221

, provided that no director appointed to the committee has a direct or indirect interest within the meaning of this section. Director action under this section shall be done by a higher number than a majority, if the articles of incorporation or bylaws so provide.

For purposes of subsection (1) of this section, a director who has a direct or indirect interest in a transaction with the corporation shall bear the burden of proving that the transaction was fair to the corporation.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 224, § 13, effective July 15, 1988; repealed and reenacted by 2018 ch. 193, § 5, effective July 14, 2018.

273.220.
Limitations on business and holding of real estate. [Repealed.]

273.221.
Committees of the board — Advisory committees.

Unless this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws provide otherwise, a board of directors may create one (1) or more committees of the board and appoint directors to serve on the committee or committees. Each committee shall have two (2) or more directors, and all committee members shall serve at the pleasure of the board of directors. The board may delegate to one (1) or more directors the authority to appoint or remove the members of the committee. An individual who is not a director may serve on a committee of the board, but may not vote on any matter that binds the corporation.

To the extent specified by the board of directors or in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, a committee may exercise the powers of the board of directors under this chapter, except as limited by subsection (3) of this section.

A committee shall not:

Authorize distributions;

In the case of a membership corporation, authorize the repurchase or redemption of a member’s membership in the corporation;

In the case of a membership corporation, authorize or propose to members any action that this chapter requires be approved by members;

Fill vacancies on the board of directors;

Adopt, amend, or repeal bylaws;

Elect, appoint, or remove any officer of the corporation;

Establish a board committee or establish or alter the manner in which committee members are appointed to these committees;

Amend or restate articles of incorporation;

Adopt a plan of merger or consolidation;

Authorize the sale, lease, exchange, or mortgage of all or substantially all of the property and assets of the corporation;

Authorize the voluntary dissolution of the corporation or revoke proceedings therefor; or

Amend, alter, or repeal any resolution of the board of directors.

Unless this chapter, the articles of incorporation, or the bylaws provide otherwise, a board of directors may create one (1) or more advisory committees, whose members need not be directors. The board of directors may appoint and remove, or may designate any director or officer of the corporation to appoint and remove, the members of an advisory committee. An advisory committee may not act on behalf of the corporation or bind the corporation to any action but may make recommendations to the board of directors, to any board committee, or to the officers of the corporation.

The creation of, delegation of authority to, or action by a committee does not alone constitute compliance by a director with the standards of conduct described in KRS

273.215

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 20; repealed and reenact. 2018, ch. 193, § 3, effective July 14, 2018.

273.223.
Place and notice of directors’ meetings.

Meetings of the board of directors, regular or special, may be held either within or without this state, and upon such notice as the bylaws may prescribe. If the bylaws are silent as to the required notice of a meeting of the board of directors, meetings of the board of directors shall be preceded by at least two (2) days notice of the time, date, and place of the meeting.

Neither the business to be transacted at, nor the purpose of, any regular or special meeting of the board of directors needs to be specified in the notice or waiver of notice of such meeting.

Attendance of a director at any meeting shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting except when a director attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.

The Circuit Court for the county where a corporation’s principal office or, if there is none in this state, its registered office is located may order a special meeting of the board of directors on the application of one-third (1/3) or more of the incumbent directors. The court may fix the time and place of the meeting, prescribe the form and content of the meeting notice, and enter such other orders as are necessary to accomplish the purpose of the meeting.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1968, ch. 165, § 21; 2010, ch. 133, § 16, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 34, § 71, effective June 24, 2015.